Hawaii statutes.
§46-2.2 Publication of supplements.
Comprehensive ordinance codes published pursuant to section 46-2.1 shall be
updated at least once a year by either of the following methods:

(1) By the publication of a cumulative pocket part
supplement which shall be appropriately indexed and shall contain all
ordinances enacted subsequent to the publication of the preceding comprehensive
ordinance code; or

(2) By a supplement or supplements in looseleaf form,
the pages of which are intended to replace existing pages or to be added
thereto in appropriate positions within the comprehensive ordinance code. In
the event the supplements are in looseleaf form, such supplements shall contain
all ordinances enacted subsequent to the last preceding looseleaf supplement and
shall also include appropriate amendment pages to the index contained in the
comprehensive ordinance code. [L 1970, c 46, §2; am L 1990, c 60, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next